Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.190

County road budget—Notice of hearing on supplemental budget.

The county legislative authority shall then publish a notice setting day of hearing for the adoption of the final supplemental budget covering the excess funds, designating the time and place of hearing and that anyone may appear thereat and be heard for or against any part of the preliminary supplemental budget. The notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks immediately following the adoption of the preliminary supplemental budget in the official newspaper of the county. The county legislative authority shall provide a sufficient number of copies of the preliminary supplemental budget to meet reasonable public demands and they shall be available not later than two weeks immediately preceding the hearing.

[ 1985 c 469 s 50; 1963 c 4 s 36.82.190. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 6, part; 1943 c 82 s 7, part; 1937 c 187 s 56, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-56, part.]